Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20268-3037
Compliance officer; compliance responsibilities.

(1) Each controllable electronic record kiosk operator shall designate and employ a compliance officer on a full-time basis.

(2) The compliance officer shall be qualified to coordinate and monitor compliance with the Controllable Electronic Record Fraud Prevention Act and all other applicable federal and state laws, rules, and regulations.

(3) The compliance officer shall not own more than twenty percent of the controllable electronic record kiosk operator.

(4) All compliance responsibilities required under federal and state laws, rules, and regulations shall be completed by full-time employees of the controllable electronic record kiosk operator or by approved outside vendors with compliance expertise supervised by full-time employees of such operator.

Laws 2025, LB609, § 6.